Illinois, session 104th, HB857.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Reimagine Public Safety Act is amended by 5changing Section 35-1 as follows: 6    (430 ILCS 69/35-1)7    Sec. 35-1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Reimagine Public Safety Act.9(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21.)